Utah statutes.
4-37-109.   Department to make rules.

(1)  The department shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:

(a)  specifying procedures for the application and renewal of certificates of registration for operating an aquaculture or fee fishing facility; and

(b)  governing the disposal or removal of aquatic animals from an aquaculture or fee fishing facility for which the certificate of registration has lapsed or been revoked.

(2) (a)  The department may make other rules consistent with its responsibilities set forth in Section 4-37-104.

(b)  Except as provided by this chapter, the rules authorized by Subsection (2)(a) shall be consistent with the suggested procedures for the detection and identification of pathogens published by the American Fisheries Society's Fish Health Section.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

